Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.572

Inflation reduction elective pay account.

The inflation reduction elective pay account is created in the state treasury. All receipts from elective pay provided under P.L. 117-169 (inflation reduction act of 2022) must be deposited into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation.

[ 2024 c 168 s 5.]

NOTES:

Effective dates—2024 c 168 ss 4-13: See note following RCW 41.05.155.